Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
PART 8
LAND DEVELOPMENT CHARGES

Law reviews:

For article, "Developer Exactions and Impact Fees", see 19

C

olo. Law. 67 (1990).

29-1-801. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and determines that statewide standards governing accountability for land development charges imposed by local governments to finance capital facilities and services are necessary and desirable to ensure reasonable certainty, stability, and fairness in the use to which moneys generated by such charges are put and to promote public confidence in local government finance. The general assembly therefore declares that this part 8 is a matter of statewide concern.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire part added, p. 1438, § 1, effective January 1, 1991.

29-1-802. Definitions.

As used in this part 8, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Capital expenditure" means any expenditure for an improvement, facility, or piece of equipment necessitated by land development which is directly related to a local government service, has an estimated useful life of five years or longer, and is required by charter or general policy of a local government pursuant to resolution or ordinance.

"Land development" means any of the following:

The subdivision of land;

Construction, reconstruction, redevelopment, or conversion of use of land or any structural alteration, relocation, or enlargement which results in an increase in the number of service units required; or

An extension of use or a new use of land which results in an increase in the number of service units required.

"Land development charge" means any fee, charge, or assessment relating to a capital expenditure which is imposed on land development as a condition of approval of such land development, as a prerequisite to obtaining a permit or service. Nothing in this section shall be construed to include sales and use taxes, building or plan review fees, building permit fees, consulting or other professional review charges, or any other regulatory or administrative fee, charge, or assessment.

"Local government" means a county, city and county, municipality, service authority, school district, local improvement district, law enforcement district, water, sanitation, fire protection, metropolitan, irrigation, drainage, or other special district, any other kind of municipal, quasi-municipal, or public corporation, or any agency or instrumentality thereof organized pursuant to law.

"Service unit" means a standard unit of measure of consumption, use, generation, or discharge of the services provided by a local government.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire part added, p. 1438, § 1, effective January 1, 1991.

29-1-803. Deposit of land development charge.

All moneys from land development charges collected, including any such moneys collected but not expended prior to January 1, 1991, shall be deposited or, if collected for another local government, transmitted for deposit, in an interest-bearing account which clearly identifies the category, account, or fund of capital expenditure for which such charge was imposed. Each such category, account, or fund shall be accounted for separately. The determination as to whether the accounting requirement shall be by category, account, or fund and by aggregate or individual land development shall be within the discretion of the local government. Any interest or other income earned on moneys deposited in said interest-bearing account shall be credited to the account. At least once annually, the local government shall publish on its official website, if any, in a clear, concise, and user-friendly format information detailing the allocation by dollar amount of each land development charge collected to an account or among accounts, the average annual interest rate on each account, and the total amount disbursed from each account, during the local government's most recent fiscal year.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2011, (HB 11-1113), ch. 23, p. 58, § 1, effective December 31, 2011.)

Source:

L. 90:

Entire part added, p. 1439, § 1, effective January 1, 1991.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (HB 11-1113), ch. 23, p. 58, § 1, effective December 31.

29-1-804. Exceptions - state-mandated charges.

This part 8 shall not apply to rates, fees, charges, or other requirements which a local government is expressly required to collect by state statute and which are not imposed to fund programs, services, or facilities of the local government.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire part added, p. 1439, § 1, effective January 1, 1991.